Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.440

Inconsistency between special findings of fact and general verdict.

When special findings of fact are inconsistent with the general verdict, the judge may enter judgment consistent with the findings of fact, may return the jurors to the jury room for further deliberations, or may order a new trial.

[ 2003 c 406 s 24; Code 1881 s 243; 1877 p 50 s 247; 1869 p 60 s 247; 1854 p 167 s 201; RRS s 365.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 49(b).